Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-630
Maintenance, defined.

Maintenance shall mean the act, operation, or continuous process of repair, reconstruction, or preservation of the whole or any part of any highway, including surface, shoulders, roadsides, traffic control devices, structures, waterways, and drainage facilities, for the purpose of keeping it at or near or improving upon its original standard of usefulness and safety.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 126.